pt-PT: Tipo de mola: Bobina; Compressão; Extensão; Gás; Folha; Em espiral; Tensão; Torção; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta opruge: Spiralno; Kompresija; Produžetak; Plinski; List; Spirala; Napetost; Torzija; Ostalo
zh-TW: 彈簧類型: 線圈彈簧; 壓縮彈簧; 拉伸彈簧; 氣彈簧; 葉片彈簧; 螺旋彈簧; 拉簧; 扭力彈簧; 其他
ru: Тип пружины: Цилиндрическая; Сжатия; Растяжения; Газовая; Пластинчатая; Спиральная; Натяжения; Торсионная; Другая
nb: Fjærtype: Spole; Komprimering; Forlengelse; Gass; Blad; Spiral; Spenning; Torsjon; Annet
nl: Veertype: Spoel; Compressie; Verlengbaar; Gas; Blad; Spiraal; Spanning; Torsie; Overig
cs: Typ pružiny: Vinuté; Tlačné; Prodlužovací; Plynové; Listové; Spirálové; Tažné; Torzní; Jiné
lt-LT: Spyruoklės tipas: Spiralė; Kompresija; Ilginamoji; Dujinė; Lapas; Spiralė; Įtempimas; Torsija; Kita
pl: Typ sprężynowy: Cewka; Ściskane; Rozciągane; Gazowe; Płytkowe; Spiralne; Naciągowe; Skrętna; Inne
ja: スプリングの種類: コイル; 圧縮; 延長; ガス; リーフ; スパイラル; テンション; トーション; その他
th: ประเภทสปริง: ขดลวด; การบีบอัด; ต่อความยาว; แก๊ส; ทรงใบไม้; แบบเกลียว; ความเครียด; แบบบิด; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 弹簧类型: 螺旋; 压缩; 拉伸; 气压; 板簧; 卷簧; 拉力; 扭力弹簧; 其他
da: Fjedertype: Spole; Kompression; Udvidelse; Gas; Blad; Spiral; Spænding; Torsion; Andet
sv: Fjädertyp: Spiral; Komprimering; Förlängning; Bensin; Blad; Spiral; Spänning; Torsion; Annat
hu: Rugó típusa: Tekercs; Összenyomás; Húzórugó; Gáz; Laprugó; Spirál; Feszítőrugó; Torziós; Egyéb
fi: Jousityyppi: Kierre; Puristusjousi; Vetojousi; Kaasu; Lehti; Spiraali; Vetokuormajousi; Vääntö; Muu
tr: Yay tipi: Helezon; Basınçlı; Uzatma; Gazlı; Yaprak; Spiral; Gergili; Burulma; Diğer
vi: Loại lò xo: Ống xoắn; Nén; Nối dài; Ga; Lá cây; Xoắn ốc; Độ căng; Xoắn; Khác
fr: Type de ressort: Bobine; Compression; Extension; Gas; Feuille; Spirale; Tension; Torsion; Autre
en: Spring type: Coil; Compression; Extension; Gas; Leaf; Spiral; Tension; Torsion; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de mola: Bobina; Compressão; Extensão; Gás; Folha; Espiral; Tensão; Torção; Outro
el: Τύπος ελατηρίου: Ελικοειδές; Συμπίεσης; Έλξης; Αέριο; Φυλλωτό; Σπειροειδές; Τάσης; Συστροφή; Άλλο
de: Federtyp: Spule; Komprimierung; Verlängerung; Gas; Blatt; Spirale; Spannung; Torsion; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di molla: Serpentina; Compressione; Estensibile; Gas; Foglia; Spirale; A tensione; Torsione; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de resort: Bobină; Compresie; Prelungire; Pe gaz; Frunză; Spirală; Tensiune; Torsiune; Altele
sk-SK: Typ pružiny: Cievka; Kompresná; Rozšírenie; Plynová; Listová; Špirálová; Napínacia; Torzná; Iné
ko: 스프링 유형: 코일; 압축; 연장; 가스; 잎; 스프링; 장력; 토션; 기타
bg-BG: Тип пружина: Намотка; Компресия; Удължение; Газ; Листо; Спирала; Напрежение; Пръскане с въртене; Друго
es: Tipo de resorte: Bobina; Compresión; Extensión; Gas; Hoja; Espiral; Tensión; Torsión; Otros
sl-SI: Vrsta vzmeti: Spirala; Compression; Podaljšana; Plin; List; Spiralna; Napetost; Torzija; Druga